test/src/morphology/N-kiiql_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kīʼl: # Noun 128 'eng /est pant/fin' - full paradigm
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Nom: kīʼl
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Gen: kīʼl
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Par: kīʼlõ
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Dat: kīʼlõn
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Ins: kīʼlõks
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Ill: kīʼlõ
     kīʼl+N+Sg+Ela: kīʼlstõ
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Nom: kīʼlõd
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Gen: kīʼlõd
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Par: kīʼlidi
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Dat: kīʼlõdõn
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Ins: kīʼlõdõks
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Ill: kīʼliž
     kīʼl+N+Pl+Ela: kīʼlist
